Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 15
TAX ANTICIPATION NOTE ACT

Section

29-15-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Tax Anticipation Note Act".

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article added, p. 1054, § 1, effective June 6.

29-15-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the issuance of tax anticipation notes by any public body as defined in section 29-15-103 (3), when advantageous to the public body or the citizens thereof, will serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, security, and general welfare of the citizens thereof and of the people of the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article added, p. 1054, § 1, effective June 6.

29-15-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Governing body" means a city council, a board of trustees, a commission, a board of county commissioners, a board of directors, or any other legislative body in which the legislative powers of a public body are vested.

"Legislative act" means an ordinance adopted by the governing body of a municipality or a resolution adopted by the governing body of any other public body.

"Public body" means any county, any municipality as defined in section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S., any school district or other district, or any public board, commission, authority, agency, political subdivision, or other public body in the state created pursuant to any general or special law or pursuant to any legislative or home rule charter.

"Tax anticipation note" means any note, interim debenture, warrant, or other security evidencing an obligation and issued pursuant to this article.

"Taxes" means ad valorem taxes on real or personal property.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article added, p. 1054, § 1, effective June 6.

29-15-104. Issuance of tax anticipation notes.

Any public body may issue, from time to time, tax anticipation notes without an election if its governing body determines that the taxes to be received by the public body will not be received in time to pay the public body's projected budgeted expenses. Such tax anticipation notes shall be issued in anticipation of the collection of taxes estimated by the governing body to be received within its then current fiscal year.

Tax anticipation notes shall be both issued and made payable within the fiscal year for which such taxes are levied.

The provisions of this subsection (2) limiting the term of tax anticipation notes shall not apply to tax anticipation notes issued by school districts on and after January 1, 1992.

Tax anticipation notes may be paid from the proceeds of ad valorem taxes on real and personal property, investment proceeds on the ad valorem taxes, or the proceeds from the tax anticipation notes.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article added, p. 1055, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 90:

(2) amended, p. 1084, § 46, effective May 31.

29-15-105. Tax anticipation note details.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any tax anticipation notes may be issued in one or more series, bear such dates, be in such denomination or denominations, mature on any date or dates occurring on or before the last day of the fiscal year of the public body in which the tax anticipation notes are issued, mature in such amount or amounts, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such form, be payable at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption with or without a premium as the legislative act of the governing body authorizing the issuance of the tax anticipation notes may provide. The tax anticipation notes may be sold at, above, or below the principal amounts thereof whenever such action is in the public interest, as determined by the governing body. The tax anticipation notes may be sold at either a public or a private sale, as determined by the governing body.

Any tax anticipation notes issued by a school district may be issued in one or more series, bear such dates, be in such denomination or denominations, mature on or before August 31 of the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in which the tax anticipation notes were issued, mature in such amount or amounts, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such form, be payable at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption with or without a premium as the legislative act of the governing body authorizing the issuance of the tax anticipation notes may provide. The tax anticipation notes may be sold at, above, or below the principal amounts thereof whenever such action is in the public interest, as determined by the governing body. The tax anticipation notes may be sold at either a public or a private sale, as determined by the governing body.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article added, p. 1055, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 608, § 6, effective May 22.

29-15-106. Limitation on issuance of tax anticipation notes.

For all public bodies except school districts, the amount of tax anticipation notes issued by a public body in any fiscal year shall not exceed fifty percent of all taxes estimated to be received by such governing body in its current fiscal year, as shown by its then current budget.

For school districts, the amount of tax anticipation notes issued by the school district in any fiscal year shall not exceed seventy-five percent of all taxes estimated to be received by such school district in its current fiscal year, as shown by its then current budget.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article added, p. 1055, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 809, § 16, effective April 27.

29-15-107. Payment of tax anticipation notes.

All ad valorem taxes on real and personal property, investment, proceeds on the ad valorem taxes, or the proceeds from tax anticipation notes received by the public body after the issuance of the tax anticipation notes, except taxes collected for retirement of existing debt, shall be paid into a special fund to be known as the tax anticipation note principal and interest redemption fund until such time as the moneys in such fund are sufficient to pay when due the principal of and the premiums, if any, and interest on the tax anticipation notes. All moneys in such fund not in excess of the amount required for such purpose shall be used to pay the principal of and the premiums, if any, and interest on the tax anticipation notes and shall be used for no other purpose.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article added, p. 1055, § 1, effective June 6.

29-15-108. No impairment of contract.

As long as any tax anticipation notes are outstanding, this article and the provisions of law authorizing the levy of taxes shall not be repealed or amended in such a manner as would materially impair the contractual rights and remedies of the holders of the tax anticipation notes.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article added, p. 1055, § 1, effective June 6.

29-15-109. No action maintainable.

No action or proceeding, at law or in equity, to review any act or proceeding, or to question the validity or enjoin the performance of any act or the issuance of any tax anticipation notes authorized by this article, or to obtain any other relief against any acts or proceedings done or had under this article, whether based upon irregularities or jurisdictional defects, shall be maintained unless such action or proceeding is commenced within thirty days after the performance of the act or the effective date of the legislative act complained of; otherwise, it shall be thereafter perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article added, p. 1056, § 1, effective June 6.

29-15-110. Independent authority.

The authority granted by this article shall constitute separate and independent authority for the powers granted in this article and shall be effective without reference to the powers or limitations contained in any other law, and the provisions of this article shall not be deemed to constitute limitations on the powers granted to public bodies under any other law.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article added, p. 1056, § 1, effective June 6.

29-15-111. Application to certain public bodies.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the provisions of this article shall apply to home rule municipalities except insofar as such provisions may be superseded by their charters or any legislative acts passed pursuant to such charters and also shall apply to special territorial charter municipalities.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article added, p. 1056, § 1, effective June 6.

29-15-112. State treasurer may issue tax and revenue anticipation notes for school districts.

The state treasurer is hereby authorized to issue tax and revenue anticipation notes for school districts in accordance with the provisions of this section for the purpose of alleviating temporary cash flow deficits of such school districts by making interest-free loans pursuant to section 22-54-110, C.R.S.

In addition to powers otherwise granted to the state treasurer by law, the state treasurer shall have the following powers in connection with the issuance of tax and revenue anticipation notes pursuant to the provisions of this section:

To use the seal of the state treasurer;

To adopt resolutions or enter into indentures of trust or other instruments to provide for the issuance of the tax and revenue anticipation notes;

To engage the services of consultants, financial advisors, underwriters, attorneys, trustees, paying agents, registrars, remarketing agents, indexing agents, depositaries, and other agents whose services may be required in connection with the issuance of the tax and revenue anticipation notes;

To enter into contracts, agreements, and other instruments in connection with the issuance of the tax and revenue anticipation notes, including but not limited to contracts with persons specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2), contracts providing for the purchase or repurchase of the tax and revenue anticipation notes, agreements with school districts regarding the payment of loans and other matters relating to the issuance of the tax and revenue anticipation notes, and indentures of trust or other instruments providing for the issuance of the tax and revenue anticipation notes;

To provide credit enhancement for the tax and revenue anticipation notes by:

Entering into such agreements as may be necessary to obtain a credit facility with respect to any issue of notes;

Pledging toward the payment of the premium, if any, and interest on the tax and revenue anticipation notes moneys from the state general fund in an amount not exceeding the amount of the premium, if any, and interest on such notes. The provisions of section 24-75-907 (2) and (3), C.R.S., that relate to the creation of a restricted account and to liens shall apply to the pledge of such moneys; except that the restricted account shall not exceed the amount of the premium, if any, and interest on the tax and revenue anticipation notes; and

Pledging toward the payment of the principal on the tax and revenue anticipation notes moneys in the school district tax and revenue anticipation notes repayment account created pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of this section.

To assist a school district in determining whether it will have a cash flow deficit that will require a loan pursuant to section 22-54-110, C.R.S., and to determine the total amount of tax and revenue anticipation notes that should be issued on behalf of the district; and

To do all other things necessary and convenient in connection with the issuance of tax and revenue anticipation notes pursuant to the provisions of this section and with the establishment of school district responsibilities relating to the tax and revenue anticipation notes and compliance with federal tax laws and regulations.

The proceeds of the tax and revenue anticipation notes may be used for the following purposes:

To make interest-free loans to school districts pursuant to section 22-54-110, C.R.S., to alleviate cash flow deficits;

To pay the costs of issuing the tax and revenue anticipation notes, including the cost of obtaining a credit facility;

To pay the principal, premium, if any, and interest related to the tax and revenue anticipation notes; and

To pay any other expense or charge incurred in connection with actions of the state treasurer authorized by the provisions of this section or section 22-54-110, C.R.S.

Pending use of the proceeds of the tax and revenue anticipation notes in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), such proceeds may be invested by the state treasurer in any investments that are legal investments for the state or may be deposited in any eligible public depository. The income from any such investment or deposit may be used for the following purposes:

To pay the costs of issuing the tax and revenue anticipation notes, including the cost of obtaining a credit facility; and

To pay the principal, premium, if any, and interest related to the tax and revenue anticipation notes.

Tax and revenue anticipation notes issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be payable from:
(4) (a) (I) Tax and revenue anticipation notes issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be payable from:

One or more payments by the school district receiving a loan from the proceeds from such notes, which payment or payments by the school district shall be, in the aggregate, sufficient to pay the principal on the tax and revenue anticipation notes issued to fund such loan;

Any moneys from the state general fund that are pledged pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (e) of subsection (2) of this section;

Income earned from any investment or deposit pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section and paragraph (b) of this subsection (4); and

If a district fails to fully repay a loan made pursuant to section 22-54-110, C.R.S., from the proceeds of the tax and revenue anticipation notes, any funds that are on hand or in the custody or possession of the state treasurer and that are eligible for investment.

The financial obligation of the state treasurer to pay the principal, premium, if any, and interest related to the tax and revenue anticipation notes shall be deemed discharged on any date on which moneys or investments in an amount sufficient for the payment of the principal, premium, if any, and interest related to the notes on the date of their final maturity is on deposit in one or more segregated and restricted accounts that are pledged irrevocably for such purpose. Such segregated and restricted accounts shall be the school district tax and revenue anticipation notes repayment account or a special account created by the controller pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (e) of subsection (2) of this section or otherwise created at the request of the state treasurer. Following such deposit, the principal, premium, if any, and interest related to the notes shall be payable solely from the segregated and restricted accounts without further financial obligation whatsoever of the state treasurer or the state. Any moneys in the segregated and restricted accounts, pending use for their intended purpose, may be invested or reinvested only in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., as such investment requirements may otherwise be limited pursuant to the terms of the resolution, indenture of trust, or other instrument providing for the issuance of the notes.

There is hereby created in the general fund an account that shall be known as the school district tax and revenue anticipation notes repayment account. All payments received from school districts pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the school district tax and revenue anticipation notes repayment account and may be invested by the state treasurer in any investments that are legal investments for the state or may be deposited in any eligible public depository. All moneys in the account that are not in excess of the amount required to pay the principal, premium, if any, and interest related to the tax and revenue anticipation notes are pledged irrevocably and shall be used for the purpose of paying the principal, premium, if any, and interest related to the tax and revenue anticipation notes for no other purpose.

Tax and revenue anticipation notes issued by the state treasurer pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be issued pursuant to a resolution or other authorizing instrument of the state treasurer. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, such notes may be issued in such aggregate principal amount, may be issued in one or more series, may bear such dates, may be in such denomination, may mature in such amount, may bear interest at such rate, may be in such form, may be payable at such place, and may be subject to such terms of redemption with or without a premium as the state treasurer by resolution or other authorizing instrument may provide. The rate of interest borne by the tax and revenue anticipation notes may be fixed, adjustable, or variable or any combination thereof. If any rate is adjustable or variable, the standard, index, method, or formula pursuant to which such rate is to be from time to time determined shall be set forth in the resolution or other authorizing instrument of the state treasurer. Such resolution or other authorizing instrument may also include a delegation of authority to an agent acting for and on behalf of the state treasurer to determine a rate within parameters, including a maximum interest rate, prescribed by the state treasurer. Tax and revenue anticipation notes issued pursuant to the provisions of this section may be sold at public or private sale and may be sold at, above, or below the principal amounts thereof.

The tax and revenue anticipation notes shall mature on any date or dates occurring on or before August 31 of the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in which the notes are issued. In the event that the tax and revenue anticipation notes have a date of maturity that is after the end of the fiscal year in which the notes are issued, on or before the final day of the fiscal year in which the notes are issued there shall be deposited in one or more special segregated and restricted accounts and pledged irrevocably to the payment of the notes an amount sufficient to pay the principal, premium, if any, and interest related to the notes on their stated maturity date.

Tax and revenue anticipation notes issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be signed by the state treasurer and countersigned by the deputy state treasurer, and the seal of the state treasurer shall be affixed thereto.

Pursuant to article 55 of title 11, C.R.S., any signature required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) may be a facsimile signature imprinted, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed on the tax and revenue anticipation notes. If all signatures of public officials on the tax and revenue anticipation notes are facsimile signatures, provisions shall be made for a manual authenticating signature on the tax and revenue anticipation notes by or on behalf of a designated authenticating agent. If an official ceases to hold office before delivery of the tax and revenue anticipation notes signed by such official, the signature or facsimile signature of the official is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes. A facsimile of the seal of the state treasurer may be imprinted, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed on the notes.

Tax and revenue anticipation notes issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be payable solely from the revenues pledged thereto, and the owners or holders of the notes may not look to any other source for repayment of the principal of or interest on the notes. Such tax and revenue anticipation notes shall not constitute a debt or an indebtedness of the state or any school district within the meaning of any applicable provision of the state constitution or state statutes.

Any tax and revenue anticipation notes issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall constitute a contract between the state treasurer and the owner or holder thereof, and neither the state nor any of its political subdivisions shall take any action impairing such contract.

The tax and revenue anticipation notes issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be exempt from all state, county, municipal, school, and other taxes imposed by any taxing authority of the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1084, § 47, effective May 31.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 531, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 91, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(2)(f)(II) and (4) amended, p. 55, § 1, effective October 11.

L. 95:

(10) amended, p. 609, § 7, effective May 22.

L. 2003:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 2168, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Prior to the recreation and reenactment of this section in 2003, subsection (10) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 31, 2000. (See L. 95, p. 609.)